Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.045

Exemptions from chapter.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit or restrict:

(1) The practice by an individual credentialed under the laws of this state and performing services within such individual's authorized scope of practice;

(2) The practice by an individual employed by the government of the United States while engaged in the performance of duties prescribed by the laws of the United States;

(3) The practice by a person who is a regular student in an educational program approved by the secretary, and whose performance of services is pursuant to a regular course of instruction or assignments from an instructor and under the general supervision of the instructor;

(4) The practice of acupuncture or Eastern medicine by any person credentialed to perform acupuncture or Eastern medicine in any other jurisdiction where such person is doing so in the course of regular instruction of a school of acupuncture, Eastern medicine, traditional Chinese medicine, or medical traditions from Japan, Korea, or other East Asian countries, approved by the secretary or in an educational seminar by a professional organization of acupuncture or Eastern medicine, provided that in the latter case, the practice is supervised directly by a person licensed under this chapter or licensed under any other healing art whose scope of practice is acupuncture and Eastern medicine.

[ 2019 c 308 s 4; 2010 c 286 s 4; 1995 c 323 s 6; 1992 c 110 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—2019 c 308: See note following RCW 18.06.010.